Tennessee statutes. Title 35 Fiduciaries And Trust Estates
Chapter 50 Miscellaneous Provisions
35-50-110. Specifically enumerated fiduciary powers that may be incorporated by reference.

Without diminution or restriction of the powers vested in the fiduciary by law, or elsewhere in the instrument, and subject to all other provisions of the instrument, the fiduciary, without the necessity of procuring any judicial authorization, or approval, shall be vested with, and in the application of the fiduciary's best judgment and discretion in behalf of the beneficiaries of the instrument shall be authorized to exercise, the powers specifically enumerated in this section:

In behalf of the estate, to join the testator's or settlor's spouse (if living), or the personal representative of the estate of the testator's or settlor's spouse (if deceased), in the execution and filing of a joint income tax return to the United States, or to the state of Tennessee, or any other governmental taxing authority (or a joint gift tax return, if and when such a joint return is authorized by law), if the fiduciary, in the exercise of the fiduciary's best judgment, believes that action to be for the best interests of the estate, or will result in a benefit to the testator's or settlor's spouse (or the estate of the testator's or settlor's spouse) exceeding in amount any monetary loss to the estate that may be caused by the filing;

To continue, to the extent and so long as in the exercise of the fiduciary's best judgment it is advisable and for the best interests of the estate so to do, the operation or participation in the operation of any farming, manufacturing, mercantile and/or other business activity or enterprise in which at the time of death the testator or settlor is engaged, either alone or in unincorporated association with others;

In behalf of the estate, to perform any and all valid executory contracts to which at the time of the testator's or settlor's death the testator or settlor is a party, and that at the time of the testator's or settlor's death have not been fully performed by the testator or settlor, and to discharge all obligations of the estate arising under or by reason of such contracts;

Pending the administration of the estate, to permit any beneficiary or beneficiaries of the will to have the use, possession and enjoyment, without charge made for the use, possession and enjoyment, (and without the fiduciary thereby relinquishing control of the property), of any real property or tangible personal property of the estate which, upon completion of the administration of the estate, will be distributable to that beneficiary or beneficiaries when, if, and to the extent that, that action will not adversely affect the rights and interests of any creditor of the estate, and in the judgment of the fiduciary it is appropriate that the beneficiary or beneficiaries have the use and enjoyment of the property, notwithstanding that it may be subjected to depreciation in value by reason of the use. The exercise of this power will not constitute a distribution of the property with respect to which it is exercised; and, whether or not exercised, neither the power nor the exercise of the power shall be deemed a constructive or actual distribution of the property to which it relates;

During the fiduciary's administration of the estate, and subject to all the other provisions of the instrument, to receive and receipt for all of the assets of the estate, and to have exclusive possession and control of those assets;

By public or private sale or sales, and for the consideration, on the terms and subject to the conditions, if any, that in the judgment of the fiduciary are for the best interests of the estate and the beneficiaries of the estate, to sell, assign, transfer, convey, or exchange any real or personal property of the estate, or the estate's undivided interest in that property, or any specific part of or interest in that property, including, but not limited to, standing timber, rock, gravel, sand, growing crops, oil, gas and other minerals or mineral rights or interests, and to grant easements on real property of the estate, and to participate in the partition of real or personal property in which the estate has an undivided interest; and to accomplish any such transactions by contracts, endorsements, assignments, bills of sale, deeds or other appropriate written instruments executed and delivered by the fiduciary in behalf of the estate, and to acknowledge the execution of those instruments in the manner provided by law for the acknowledgment of the execution of deeds when such acknowledgments are required or appropriate;

For the consideration, on the terms and subject to the conditions, if any, that in the judgment of the fiduciary are for the best interests of the estate and the beneficiaries of the estate, to lease, for terms which may exceed the duration of the estate, any real or tangible personal property of the estate, or any specific parts of that property or interests in that property, including, but not limited to, oil, gas and other mineral leases; and to accomplish those leases by appropriate written instruments executed and delivered by the fiduciary in behalf of the estate, and acknowledge the execution of those instruments in the manner provided by law for the acknowledgment of the execution of deeds when such acknowledgments are required or appropriate;

In behalf of the estate, to borrow money; evidence those loans by promissory notes or other evidences of indebtedness signed by the fiduciary in the fiduciary's fiduciary capacity, to be binding upon the assets of the estate but not upon the fiduciary in the fiduciary's individual capacity; secure those loans by assigning or pledging personal property of the estate, or by mortgages or deeds of trust or other appropriate instruments imposing liens upon real property or tangible personal property of the estate; and repay those loans, including principal and interest due thereon;

In behalf of the estate, to borrow money from the fiduciary in the fiduciary's individual capacity and secure those loans in the same manner as though they were made by a third person;

To enter into contracts binding upon the estate, but not upon the fiduciary in the fiduciary's individual capacity, that are reasonably incident to the administration of the estate, and that the fiduciary in the exercise of the fiduciary's best judgment believes to be for the best interests of the estate;

To settle, by compromise or otherwise, claims or demands against the estate, or held in behalf of the estate;

To release and satisfy of record, in whole or in part, and enter of record credits upon, any mortgage or other lien constituting an asset of the estate;

To abandon and charge off as worthless, in whole or in part, claims or demands held by or in behalf of the estate that, in the judgment of the fiduciary, are in whole or in part uncollectible;

To pay taxes and excises lawfully chargeable against the assets of the estate that are in the possession or under the control of the fiduciary, including, but not limited to, ad valorem taxes upon real and personal property of the estate that became due and payable prior to the property coming into the hands of the fiduciary, or that become due and payable while the property remains in the fiduciary's possession or under the fiduciary's control; excluding, however, income taxes payable by distributees, assessed with respect to income that has been distributed by the fiduciary pursuant to the instrument;

To repair and maintain in good condition real and tangible personal property of the estate so long as the property remains in the possession or under the control of the fiduciary;

To invest liquid assets of the estate, and from time to time exchange or liquidate and reinvest such assets, pending distribution thereof, if and when such investments in the judgment of the fiduciary will not impede or delay distribution thereof pursuant to this instrument or as otherwise by law required, and in the judgment of the fiduciary are advisable and for the best interests of the estate and the beneficiaries thereof. In making such investments, the fiduciary shall be guided by the prudent investor rule, as authorized and defined in title 35, chapter 14; and the investments thus authorized shall be understood to include, but not to be limited to, loans secured by mortgages, or liens otherwise imposed, upon real or personal property;

Subject to the making and keeping of appropriate records with respect to the investments, which will at all times clearly identify the equitable rights and interests of the estate in the investments, to invest funds of the estate in undivided interests in negotiable or nonnegotiable securities, or other assets, the remaining undivided interests in which are held by the fiduciary in a fiduciary capacity for the use and benefit of other beneficiaries;

To retain investments that initially come into the hands of the fiduciary among the assets of the estate, without liability for loss or depreciation or diminution in value resulting from the retention, so long as in the judgment of the fiduciary it is not clearly for the best interests of the estate, and the distributees of the estate, that those investments be liquidated, although the investments may not be productive of income or otherwise may not be such as the fiduciary would be authorized to make;

At any time and from time to time, to keep all or any portion of the estate in liquid form, uninvested, for such time as the fiduciary may deem advisable, without liability for any loss of income occasioned by so doing;

To deposit funds of the trust in one (1) or more accounts carried by the fiduciary, in a clearly specified fiduciary capacity, in any one (1) or more banks and/or trust companies whose deposits are insured under the Federal Deposit Insurance Act as now constituted or as that act may be amended; and if the fiduciary is itself a bank or a trust company, and is otherwise qualified, the fiduciary may serve as the depository;

To deposit for safekeeping with any bank or trust company, including the fiduciary itself if the fiduciary is a bank or trust company, any negotiable or nonnegotiable securities or other documents constituting assets or records of the estate;

To bring and prosecute or defend actions at law or in equity for the protection of the assets or interests of the estate or for the protection or enforcement of the instrument;

To employ attorneys, accountants, investment managers and delegate investment authority to them or other persons whose services may be necessary or advisable, in the judgment of the fiduciary, to advise or assist the fiduciary in the discharge of the fiduciary's duties, or in the conduct of any business constituting an asset of the estate, or in the management, maintenance, improvement, preservation or protection of any property of the estate, or otherwise in the exercise of any powers vested in the fiduciary;

To procure and pay premiums on policies of insurance to protect the estate, or any of the assets of the estate, against liability for personal injuries or property damage, or against loss or damage by reason of fire, windstorm, collision, theft, embezzlement or other hazards against which such insurance is normally carried in connection with activities or on properties such as those with respect to which the fiduciary procures such insurance;

To allocate items of receipts or disbursements to either corpus or income of the estate, as the fiduciary in the exercise of the fiduciary's best judgment and discretion deems to be proper, without thereby doing violence to clearly established and generally recognized principles of accounting;

In behalf of the estate, to purchase or otherwise lawfully acquire real or personal property, or undivided interests in property, the ownership of which, in the judgment of the fiduciary, will be advantageous to the estate, and the beneficiary or beneficiaries of the estate;

To construct improvements on real property of the estate, or remove or otherwise dispose of improvements, when that action is in the judgment of the fiduciary advisable and for the best interests of the estate;

To exercise in person or by proxy, with or without a power of substitution vested in the proxy, all voting rights incident to the ownership of corporate stock or the other securities constituting assets of the estate; and exercise all other rights and privileges incident to the ownership of those securities, including, but not limited to, the right to sell, exchange, endorse or otherwise transfer the securities, consent to, or oppose, reorganizations, consolidations, mergers or other proposed corporate actions by the issuer of the securities, exercise or decline to exercise options to purchase additional shares or units of the securities or of related securities, and pay all assessments or other expenses necessary in the judgment of the fiduciary for the protection of the securities or of the value of the securities;

To employ any bank or trust company to serve as custodian of any securities constituting assets of the estate, and cause the securities (if they are nonassessable) to be registered in the name of the custodian or of its nominee, without disclosure that they are held in a fiduciary capacity; authorize the bank or trust company, as agent and in behalf of the fiduciary, to collect, receive and receipt for income derived from the securities, or the proceeds of sales, assignments or exchanges of the securities made by authority and under the direction of the fiduciary, and to remit to the fiduciary such income or other proceeds derived from the securities; and pay to the custodian reasonable and customary charges made by it for the performance of these services; provided, that any such action taken by the fiduciary shall not increase, decrease or otherwise affect the fiduciary's liability, responsibility or accountability with respect to the securities;

To register nonassessable securities constituting assets of the estate in the name of the fiduciary or of the fiduciary's nominee, without disclosure that the securities are held in a fiduciary capacity, or hold the securities unregistered or otherwise in such form that the title thereto will pass by delivery, without, in any such case, increasing, decreasing or otherwise affecting the fiduciary's liability, responsibility or accountability with respect to the securities;

In making distribution of capital assets of the estate to distributees of the estate under the instrument, except when otherwise required by other provisions of the instrument, to make the distribution in kind or in cash, or partially in kind and partially in cash, as the fiduciary finds to be most practicable and for the best interests of the distributees; distribute real property to two (2) or more distributees in division, or to partition real property for the purpose of distribution, as the fiduciary in the exercise of the fiduciary's best judgment finds to be most practicable and for the best interests of the distributees; and determine the value of capital assets for the purpose of making distribution of the assets if and when there is more than one (1) distributee of the assets, which determination shall be binding upon the distributees unless clearly capricious, erroneous and inequitable;

To inspect and monitor property to which the fiduciary takes legal title, including interests in sole proprietorships, partnerships, or corporations and any assets owned by such business enterprises, for the purpose of determining compliance with environmental laws affecting the property, and respond or take any other action necessary to prevent, abate or clean up, on behalf of the trust or estate as is necessary, before or after the initiation of enforcement action by any governmental body, any actual or threatened violation of any environmental laws affecting property held by the fiduciary relating to hazardous substances or environmental laws;

To refuse to accept property in trust if the fiduciary determines that any property to be donated to a trust estate is contaminated by any hazardous substances, or the property is being used or has been used for any activities, directly or indirectly involving hazardous substances, that could result in liability to the trust or estate or otherwise impair the value of the assets held in the trust;

To settle or compromise, at any time, any and all claims against the estate or trust that may be asserted by any governmental body or private party involving the alleged violation of any environmental laws affecting property held in the estate or trust;

To disclaim any power granted by any document or any statute or rule of law that, in the sole discretion of the fiduciary, may cause the fiduciary to incur personal liability under any environmental laws; and

To decline to serve as fiduciary if the fiduciary reasonably believes that there is or may be a conflict of interest between it in its fiduciary capacity and in its individual capacity because of potential claims or liabilities that may be asserted against it on behalf of the estate or trust resulting from the type or condition of assets held therein.

The fiduciary shall be entitled to charge the cost for any inspection, insurance, review, abatement, response or cleanup, or any other remedial action, as authorized in this subdivision (32), against the income or principal of the estate or trust and shall not be personally responsible for that cost. The fiduciary shall not be personally liable to any beneficiary or any other party for any decrease in value or exhaustion of assets in the estate or trust by reason of the fiduciary's compliance with any environmental laws, specifically including any reporting requirements under environmental laws.

While acting in good faith and according to traditional fiduciary standards, the fiduciary shall not be considered an “owner,” “operator” or other party otherwise liable for violation of environmental laws unless the fiduciary has actually caused or contributed to the violation.

For the purposes of this subdivision (32), “hazardous substances” means any substance defined as hazardous or toxic or otherwise regulated by any federal, state or local law, rule or regulation relating to the protection of the environment or human health. Such laws are referred to in this subdivision (32) as “environmental laws”; and

To do any and all other things, not in violation of any other terms of the instrument, that, in the judgment of the fiduciary, are necessary or appropriate for the proper management, investment and distribution of the assets of the estate in accordance with the instrument, and in the fiduciary's judgment are for the best interests of the estate and its beneficiaries.

Acts 1963, ch. 110, § 3; T.C.A., § 35-618; Acts 1991, ch. 182, § 2; 1999, ch. 491, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. The Federal Deposit Insurance Act referred to in subdivision (20) is compiled generally in 12 U.S.C.

The common law prudent man rule, formerly referred to in this section, is obsolete and was deleted in 2002 when the Uniform Prudent Investor Act, compiled in title 35, chapter 14, was enacted.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (5th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 755, 992, 1018, 1019.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 4-305 — 4-307, 4-501 — 4-506, 4-612.

Tennessee Jurisprudence. 14 Tenn. Juris., Guardian and Ward, § 9.

Law Reviews.

The Family Trust in Estate Planning in Tennessee (Herman E. Taylor), 16 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 32.

Vesting of Title in Probate Estate: The Curious Meaning of Words (Dan Holbrook), 38 No. 12 Tenn. B.J. 26 (2002).

35-50-111. Fiduciary bond on interest.

Whenever a fiduciary, as defined in § 35-2-102, is required by law to execute a bond for assets placed with a financial institution in the form of a bank, trust company or savings and loan association, and the fiduciary agrees with the institution not to withdraw the principal of the assets, the bond required of the fiduciary shall be for the amount of the interest. No bond adjustment is necessary if the principal, or a portion of the principal, is withdrawn with court approval. The authorization for elimination of bond on the principal so deposited with the financial institution shall not apply unless the agreement by the fiduciary with the institution is approved by the court charged with administering the funds or the estate of the minor, and unless the agreement is filed in and enforced by the court.

Acts 1976, ch. 675, § 2; T.C.A., § 35-621.

35-50-112. Impairment of marital deduction prohibited.

No executor, trustee or other fiduciary may take, or refuse to take, any action, or make or retain any investment, the result of which would defeat an otherwise available marital deduction under the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C.), or under the laws of this state, if the obvious and expressed intent of the testator or settlor was to take advantage of this deduction. After May 23, 1977, this section applies to all acts or investments, by all executors, trustees or other fiduciaries, as to all wills and trusts, whenever these instruments were executed or created.

Acts 1977, ch. 336, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 35-622; Acts 1985, ch. 140, § 33.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (5th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 960, 992.

Law Reviews.

Some Whys and Wherefores of Will-Drafting — Revised (Robert L. McMurray), 15 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 2 (1979).

35-50-113. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 35-50-113 (Acts 1983, ch. 87, § 2; T.C.A., § 35-623), concerning transfer of beneficiary's interest and trust, was repealed by Acts 1985, ch. 140, § 1.

35-50-114. Powers exercisable by majority — Liability.

Unless it is otherwise provided by an instrument under which the fiduciaries are acting, or an amendment of the instrument, or by court order, any power vested in three (3) or more fiduciaries, other than the power to remove a fiduciary, may be exercised by a majority of those fiduciaries; but no fiduciary who has not joined in exercising a power shall be liable to the beneficiaries or to others for the consequences of that exercise, nor shall a dissenting fiduciary be liable for the consequences of an act in which that fiduciary joins at the direction of the majority fiduciaries, if the fiduciary expressed the dissent in writing to the cofiduciaries at or before the time of the joinder.

Nothing in this section excuses a cofiduciary from liability for inactivity in the administration of the estate or trust nor for failure to attempt to prevent a breach of trust.

As used in this section, “fiduciary” is construed to mean the one (1) or more personal representatives, whether male, female or corporate, of a testamentary estate.

This section is effective with regard to all estates and trusts under administration on or after April 8, 1985, regardless of the date of the instruments under which administration is being carried out or when administration began.

Acts 1985, ch. 154, § 1; 2004, ch. 537, § 106.

35-50-115. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 35-50-115 (Acts 1985, ch. 139, § 4; 1988, ch. 872, § 2) concerning revocation of inter vivos trust agreements by divorce or annulment, was revoked in its entirety by Acts 1992, ch. 951, § 12, effective July 1, 1985.

35-50-116. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 35-50-116 (Acts 1987, ch. 322, § 20), concerning the revocation of trust agreement by appointee, was repealed by Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 100, effective July 1, 2004.

35-50-117. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 35-50-117 (Acts 1987, ch. 301, § 1), concerning the judicial division or consolidation of trusts, was repealed by Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 101, effective July 1, 2004.

35-50-118. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 35-50-118 (Acts 1988, ch. 657, § 1), concerning trusts for care of animals, was repealed by Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 102, effective July 1, 2004.

35-50-119. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 35-50-119 (Acts 1988, ch. 854, § 16; 1999, ch. 491, § 10), concerning notification of trust beneficiaries, was repealed by Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 103, effective July 1, 2004.

35-50-120. Blind trust.

A trust shall be considered a “blind trust” if the trust is created to benefit an individual, the individual's spouse or any dependent child and is under the management and control of a trustee who is a bank or trust company authorized to exercise fiduciary powers, a licensed attorney or a broker who:

Is independent of and not associated with any party interested in the trust;

Is not or has not been an employee of any interested party or any organization affiliated with any interested party, and is not a partner of, or involved in any joint venture or other investment with any interested party; and

Is not a relative of any party.

There shall be no communications direct or indirect between the trustee and an interested party with respect to the trust unless the communication is in writing, except for communications that solely consist of requests for distributions of cash or other unspecified assets of the trust. The written communications shall be limited to the general financial interest and needs of the interested party including, but not limited to, an interest in maximizing income or long-term capital gain.

The interested parties shall make no effort to obtain information with respect to the holdings of the trust, including obtaining a copy of any trust tax return filed or any information relating to the trust, except as may be needed by the interested parties in order to file tax returns.

Any trustee of a trust as provided in this section for an interested party that is required to make disclosures under title 8, chapter 50, part 5, shall make to the best of the trustee's knowledge such disclosures as are required or be subject to the penalties provided in § 8-50-505.

This section does not apply to any “blind trust” or other trust or financial arrangement or agreement having the same effect or status as a “blind trust” in existence prior to May 12, 1988. All such trusts, arrangements or agreements shall continue to operate in accordance with the terms and conditions under which they were created.

Acts 1988, ch. 951, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence. 24 Tenn. Juris., Trusts and Trustees, § 2.

35-50-121. Delayed receipt of trust corpus.

Any trust agreement or declaration of trust may be valid even if no corpus is delivered to the trustee at the time of execution of the instrument if the trustee has the right to receive corpus at a later time or times from the trustor, the trustor's estate or other persons or sources.

Acts 1989, ch. 288, § 4.

35-50-122. Generation-skipping tax — Definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Generation-skipping tax” means the generation-skipping transfer tax imposed by chapter 13 of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. §§ 2601 et seq.);

“Internal Revenue Code” means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 and successor provisions and codifications of that Code;

“Trust” means any express trust, with additions, wherever and however created, or any separate share of a trust, and includes any arrangement, other than an estate, that, although not a trust, has substantially the same effect as a trust; and

“Trustee” means an original, additional or successor trustee, whether or not appointed or confirmed by a court, and, in the case of an arrangement that is not a trust but is treated as a trust for purposes of the generation-skipping tax, includes the person in actual or constructive possession of the property subject to the arrangement.

A trustee is authorized, but not required, to divide any trust into two (2) or more separate trusts, of equal or unequal value, in order to create one (1) or more trusts entirely exempt from the generation-skipping tax and one (1) or more trusts entirely subject to the generation-skipping tax. Other terms and provisions of both trusts will remain substantially identical in all respects to the original trust.

The purpose of this section is to authorize a trustee to take appropriate action to preclude or minimize to the extent possible the imposition of the generation-skipping tax, and this section shall be broadly construed to carry out this purpose.

A trustee may exercise the authority granted in this section without prior approval or leave of any court.

Any trustee who in good faith acts or fails to act shall not be liable to any person for taking or failing to take any action authorized by this section.

This section applies to any trust that may be subject to chapter 13 of the Internal Revenue Code.

Acts 1991, ch. 192, § 1; 1997, ch. 407, § 7; 2004, ch. 866, § 8.

35-50-123. Powers of fiduciaries.

Each fiduciary, as defined in § 35-2-102, has the powers enumerated in § 35-50-110(32).

Acts 1992, ch. 951, § 13.

35-50-124. Limited power of trustee — Beneficiary — Application.

Due to the potential conflict of interest that exists between a trustee who is a beneficiary and other beneficiaries of the trust, any power conferred upon a trustee, other than the settlor of a revocable or amendable trust:

To make discretionary distributions of either principal or income to or for the benefit of the trustee, except to provide for that trustee's health, education, maintenance, or support as described under Internal Revenue Code §§ 2041 and 2514 (26 U.S.C. §§ 2401 and 2514);

To make discretionary allocations of receipts or expenses as between principal and income, unless the trustee acts in a fiduciary capacity whereby the trustee has no power to enlarge or shift any beneficial interest except as an incidental consequence of the discharge of the trustee's fiduciary duties;

To make discretionary distributions of either principal or income to satisfy any legal support obligations of the trustee; or

To exercise any other power, including the right to remove or to replace any trustee, so as to cause the powers enumerated in subdivision (a)(1)(A), (B) or (C) to be exercised on behalf of, or for the benefit of, a beneficiary who is also a trustee,

cannot be exercised by that trustee.

Any of the foregoing proscribed powers that are conferred upon two (2) or more trustees may be exercised by the trustees who are not so disqualified. If there is no trustee qualified to exercise the power and the document creating the trust does not include authority for the appointment of an independent trustee, any party in interest, as defined in subsection (c), may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction to appoint an independent trustee and the power may be exercised by the independent trustee appointed by the court.

This section applies to any trust unless application of the statute would cause the loss of a marital or charitable deduction or loss of generation skipping transfer tax exemption or the terms of the trust either:

Refer specifically to this section and provide expressly to the contrary;

Clearly indicate an intent by the settlor of the trust or testator of a will to grant the trustee who is also a beneficiary the power in question to accomplish a particular beneficial tax result; or

Contain language similarly limiting the powers of a trustee who is also a beneficiary.

For the purpose of subsection (a) or (b):

If the trust is revocable or amendable and the settlor is not incapacitated, the party in interest is the settlor.

If the trust is revocable or amendable and the settlor is incapacitated, the party in interest is the settlor's legal representative under applicable law or the settlor's donee under the durable power of attorney that is sufficient to grant such authority.

If the trust is not revocable or amendable, the parties in interest are:

Each trustee then serving;

Each income beneficiary then in existence or, if any such beneficiary has not attained majority or is otherwise incapacitated, the beneficiary's natural guardian or other legal representative under applicable law or the beneficiary's donee under a durable power of attorney that is sufficient to grant such authority; and

Each remainder beneficiary then in existence or, if any such remainder beneficiary has not attained majority or is otherwise incapacitated, the beneficiary's natural guardian or other legal representative under applicable law or the beneficiary's donee under a durable power of attorney that is sufficient to grant such authority.

A person who has the right to remove or replace a trustee does not possess nor may that person be deemed to possess, by virtue of having that right, the powers of the trustee that is subject to removal or to replacement.

Acts 1997, ch. 439, § 1; 2000, ch. 893, §§ 1-4.

35-50-125. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 35-50-125 (Acts 1999, ch. 263, § 1; 2000, ch. 893, §§ 5-7), concerning written agreements on provisions of trust or powers and duties of corporate trustee, was repealed by Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 104, effective July 1, 2004.

35-50-126. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 35-50-126 (Acts 2000, ch. 893, § 8), concerning the certification of trust, was repealed by Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 105, effective July 1, 2004.

35-50-127. Release of personal health information to determine capacity.

Where it is necessary, under the terms of a trust to determine the mental or physical incapacity of a patient, a healthcare provider may release personal health information to a licensed physician or licensed attorney at law if the physician or attorney at law signs and furnishes the healthcare provider with an affidavit that the release of information is necessary to determine the mental or physical incapacity of the patient, or of the settlor, or of the donor, or of the trustee, or of the agent or other fiduciary under a trust that was signed by the patient where incapacity causes the document to come into effect, discontinues its effect or calls for a change in a fiduciary acting under the document.

Acts 2004, ch. 866, § 9.

Cross-References. Release of personal health information to determine capacity, § 34-6-111.